Maryland, session 2025, HB0297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
31–107.
(a) There is a Maryland Health Benefit Exchange Fund.
(b) (1) The purpose of the Fund is to:
(i) provide funding for the operation and administration of the
Exchange in carrying out the purposes of the Exchange under this subtitle;
– 1 –

Ch. 721 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) provide funding for the establishment and operation of the State
Reinsurance Program authorized under this subtitle;
(iii) provide funding for the Medical Assistance Program and the
Senior Prescription Drug Assistance Program;
(iv) provide funding for the establishment and operation of Health
Equity Resource Communities under Title 20, Subtitle 14 of the Health – General Article;
and
(v) provide funding for the establishment and operation of the
State–Based Young Adult Health Insurance Subsidies [Pilot] Program authorized under
this subtitle.
(2) The operation and administration of the Exchange, the State
Reinsurance Program, the State–Based Young Adult Health Insurance Subsidies [Pilot]
Program, and the Qualified Resident Enrollment Program may include functions delegated
by the Exchange to a third party under law or by contract.
(c) The Exchange shall administer the Fund.
(d) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) any user fees or other assessments collected by the Exchange;
(2) all revenue deposited into the Fund that is received from the
distribution of the premium tax under § 6–103.2 of this article;
(3) income from investments made on behalf of the Fund;
(4) interest on deposits or investments of money in the Fund;
(5) money collected by the Board as a result of legal or other actions taken
by the Board on behalf of the Exchange or the Fund;
(6) money donated to the Fund;
(7) money awarded to the Fund through grants;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 721
(8) any pass–through funds received from the federal government under a
waiver approved under § 1332 of the Affordable Care Act;
(9) any funds designated by the federal government to provide reinsurance
to carriers that offer individual health benefit plans in the State;
(10) any funds designated by the State to provide reinsurance to carriers
that offer individual health benefit plans in the State;
(11) any funds designated by the State to provide State–based health
insurance subsidies to young adults in the State;
(12) any federal funds received in accordance with § 31–121 of this subtitle
for the administration of small business tax credits; and
(13) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(f) (1) The Fund may be used only:
(i) 1. for the operation and administration of the Exchange in
carrying out the purposes authorized under this subtitle;
2. for the establishment and operation of the State
Reinsurance Program; and
3. for appropriations to the Health Equity Resource
Community Reserve Fund under § 20–1407 of the Health – General Article;
(ii) in fiscal years 2021 and 2022, for the Medical Assistance
Program within the Medical Care Programs Administration of the Maryland Department
of Health;
(iii) in fiscal year 2022, for the Senior Prescription Drug Assistance
Program established under Title 15, Subtitle 10 of the Health – General Article; and
(iv) for the establishment and operation of the State–Based Young
Adult Health Insurance Subsidies [Pilot] Program.
(2) In each of fiscal years 2023 through 2025, the Governor shall:
(i) transfer $15,000,000 to the Health Equity Resource Community
Reserve Fund; and
– 3 –

Ch. 721 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) include the funds transferred in accordance with item (i) of this
paragraph in the annual budget bill as an appropriation to the Health Equity Resource
Community Reserve Fund under § 20–1407 of the Health – General Article.
(g) (1) The Board shall maintain separate accounts within the Fund for
Exchange operations, for the State Reinsurance Program, and for the State–Based Young
Adult Health Insurance Subsidies [Pilot] Program.
(2) Accounts within the Fund shall contain the money that is intended to
support the purpose for which each account is designated.
(3) Funds received from the distribution of the premium tax under §
6–103.2 of this article shall be placed in the account for Exchange operations and may be
used only for the purpose of funding the operation and administration of the Exchange.
(4) The following funds may be used only for the purposes of funding the
State Reinsurance Program:
(i) any pass–through funds received from the federal government
under a waiver approved under § 1332 of the Affordable Care Act to provide reinsurance to
carriers that offer individual health benefit plans in the State;
(ii) any funds designated by the federal government to provide
reinsurance to carriers that offer individual health benefit plans in the State;
(iii) any funds designated by the State to provide reinsurance to
carriers that offer individual health benefit plans in the State; and
(iv) except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, funds received
from the distribution of the assessment under § 6–102.1 of this article.
(h) (1) Expenditures from the Fund for the purposes authorized by this
subtitle may be made only:
(i) with an appropriation from the Fund approved by the General
Assembly in the State budget; or
(ii) by the budget amendment procedure provided for in Title 7,
Subtitle 2 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) Notwithstanding § 7–304 of the State Finance and Procurement Article,
if the amount of the distribution from the premium tax under § 6–103.2 of this article
exceeds in any State fiscal year the actual expenditures incurred for the operation and
administration of the Exchange, funds in the Exchange operations account from the
premium tax that remain unspent at the end of the State fiscal year shall revert to the
General Fund of the State.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 721
(3) If operating expenses of the Exchange may be charged to either State
or non–State fund sources, the non–State funds shall be charged before State funds are
charged.
(i) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (h)(2) of this section, no part of the
Fund may revert or be credited to the General Fund or any special fund of the State.
(j) A debt or an obligation of the Fund is not a debt of the State or a pledge of
credit of the State.
31–122.
(a) In this section, [“Pilot Program”] “PROGRAM” means the State–Based Young
Adult Health Insurance Subsidies [Pilot] Program.
(b) (1) The SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
Exchange, in consultation with the Commissioner and as approved by the Board, shall MAY
establish and implement a State–Based Young Adult Health Insurance Subsidies [Pilot]
Program to provide subsidies to young adults for the purchase of health benefit plans in
the individual health insurance market.
(2) THE EXCHANGE MAY NOT IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM FOR
CALENDAR YEARS IN WHICH FUNDS FROM THE DISTRIBUTION OF THE ASSESSMENT
UNDER § 6–102.1 OF THIS ARTICLE ARE NOT AVAILABLE.
(c) The [Pilot] Program required under this section shall be designed to:
(1) reduce the amount that young adults pay for health benefit plans in the
individual health insurance market; and
(2) target young adults who are not directly impacted by the State
Reinsurance Program.
(d) (1) For EACH calendar [years 2022 through 2025] YEAR, the Exchange, in
consultation with the Commissioner and as approved by the Board, shall establish subsidy
eligibility and payment parameters for the [Pilot] Program.
(2) In determining the subsidy eligibility and payment parameters
required under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Exchange shall consider:
– 5 –

Ch. 721 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) young adults at least 18 years old and under the age of 41 years;
and
(ii) income groups between 133% and 400% of the federal poverty
level.
(e) [(1)] Subject to available funds [and paragraph (2) of this subsection], in
each [of] fiscal [years 2022 through 2026] YEAR, the Exchange may designate funds from
the Fund to be used for the [Pilot] Program so that annual subsidies may be provided to
young adults who meet the subsidy eligibility and payment parameters established under
subsection (d) of this section.
[(2) (I) For each of calendar years 2024 and 2025, the funds designated
under paragraph (1) of this subsection may not exceed $20,000,000 plus any unspent funds
designated for subsidies for young adults in a previous calendar year.]
(II) FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2026 AND EACH CALENDAR YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE EXCHANGE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSIONER, MAY
DESIGNATE FUNDS FROM THE FUND TO PROVIDE ANNUAL SUBSIDIES TO YOUNG
ADULTS WHO MEET THE SUBSIDY ELIGIBILITY AND PAYMENT PARAMETERS
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(f) The Exchange shall adopt regulations implementing the provisions of this
section.
(g) The Exchange shall adopt regulations to provide a subsidy to cover 100% of
the cost of the premium for young adults who have a 0% expected contribution under the
subsidy eligibility parameters established under subsection (d) of this section.
(h) (1) The Exchange shall track on a monthly basis expenditures on subsidies
provided under the [Pilot] Program, including:
(i) the average number of young adults receiving subsidies under
the [Pilot] Program; and
(ii) the average subsidy amount received by young adults under the
[Pilot] Program.
(2) The Exchange shall track:
(i) the impact the [Pilot] Program has on rates in the individual
insurance market; and
(ii) the impact of covering 100% of the cost of premiums for qualified
participants on effectuation rates and termination for nonpayment rates.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 721
(3) The information tracked by the Exchange under paragraphs (1) and (2)
of this subsection shall be:
(i) posted on the website of the Exchange; and
(ii) included in the annual report required under §
31–119(d) of this subtitle.
Chapter 778 of the Acts of 2021, as amended by Chapters 256 and 257 of the Acts
of 2023
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2021. [It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2026,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 7 –